Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-108
Board; chairperson; rules and regulations; quorum; seal; records.

The board shall elect annually a chairperson from its members. The board shall receive and account for all fees and other money received by it under the Public Accountancy Act. The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the orderly conduct of its affairs and the administration of the act. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The board shall adopt a seal. The board shall keep records of its proceedings, and in any proceedings in court, civil or criminal, arising out of or founded upon any provision of the act, copies of such records certified as correct under the seal of the board shall be admissible in evidence as tending to prove the content of the records.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 3, p. 56;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 5.